Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-410
Records of registrants; inventory; violation; penalty; storage.

(1) Each registrant manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing controlled substances in Schedule I, II, III, IV, or V of section 28-405 shall keep and maintain a complete and accurate record of all stocks of such controlled substances on hand. Such records shall be maintained for five years.

(2) Each registrant manufacturing, distributing, storing, or dispensing such controlled substances shall prepare a biennial inventory of each controlled substance in the registrant's possession in accordance with 21 C.F.R. 1304.11, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2024. Such inventory shall be taken within two years after the previous inventory date. A registrant whose inventory fails to comply with this subsection shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

(3) This section shall not apply to practitioners who prescribe or administer, as a part of their practice, controlled substances listed in Schedule II, III, IV, or V of section 28-405 unless such practitioner regularly engages in dispensing any such drug or drugs to his or her patients.

(4) Controlled substances shall be stored in accordance with the following:

(a) All controlled substances listed in Schedule I of section 28-405 must be stored in a locked cabinet; and

(b) All controlled substances listed in Schedule II, III, IV, or V of section 28-405 must be stored in a locked cabinet or distributed throughout the inventory of noncontrolled substances in a manner which will obstruct theft or diversion of the controlled substances or both.

(5) Each pharmacy which is registered with the administration and in which controlled substances are stored or dispensed shall complete a controlled-substances inventory when there is a change in the pharmacist-in-charge. The inventory shall contain the information required in the annual inventory, and the original copy shall be maintained in the pharmacy for five years after the date it is completed.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 70;

Laws 1996, LB 1108, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 550, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB902, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB166, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 3.